Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,114
Equity securities insider trading; rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance shall have the power to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the execution of the functions vested in him or her by the provisions of sections 44-3,107 to 44-3,113 and may for such purpose classify domestic stock insurance companies, securities, and other persons or matters within his or her jurisdiction. No provision of sections 44-3,107 to 44-3,109 imposing any liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule or regulation of the Director of Insurance, notwithstanding that such rule or regulation may, after such act or omission, be amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

Laws 1965, c. 248, § 8, p. 705;

Laws 1969, c. 368, § 9, p. 1309;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 111.